Louisiana, session 2026, HB679.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1321(T) and (U) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:1321(V) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1321. State identification cards; special identification cards; issuance; veteran
designation; special needs or accommodation designations; traumatic brain
injury designation; fees; expiration and renewal; exceptions; promulgation
of rules; promotion of use; persons less than twenty-one years of age; the
Protect and Save our Children Program; Selective Service Registration
* * *
T.(1) Upon request of an applicant for a special identification card, a
designation that the applicant has traumatic brain injury shall be exhibited on the
special identification card upon presentation of a statement from a qualified medical
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-541 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 679
or mental health professional licensed in Louisiana or any other state or territory of
the United States verifying the applicant's disability as established by administrative
rule. The qualified medical or mental health professional shall be authorized to
diagnose traumatic brain injury. No additional fee shall be charged to include such
designation.
(2) Upon the renewal of a special identification card, an applicant who has
traumatic brain injury shall provide a statement from a qualified medical or mental
health professional licensed in Louisiana or any other state or territory of the United
States verifying the applicant's disability as established by administrative rule.
(3) Any person who has not been diagnosed with traumatic brain injury who
willfully and falsely represents himself as having the qualifications to obtain the
special designation authorized by this Subsection shall be fined not less than one
hundred dollars nor more than two hundred fifty dollars, or shall be imprisoned for
not more than thirty days, or both. Any subsequent offense shall result in a fine of
not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or
imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or both.
(4) In addition to the training requirements contained in R.S. 40:2404.2(C),
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, public safety services, shall
establish and implement a law enforcement training course relative to law
enforcement officers' interaction with persons with traumatic brain injury. The
course shall instruct law enforcement officers on sensitivity and awareness to ensure
equitable treatment and how to effectively communicate and interact with persons
with traumatic brain injury. At a minimum, the course shall include the following:
(a) Identification of indicators that a person has traumatic brain injury.
(b) Identification of procedures that an officer should employ when
encountering a person with traumatic brain injury.
(c) Demonstrations of communication and interactive techniques required
to effectively interact with a person with traumatic brain injury.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-541 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 679
(d) Explanations that provide law enforcement officers with an
understanding of the traumatic brain injury and examples of unexpected actions that
could potentially be taken by persons diagnosed with traumatic brain injury.
(e) Explanations of the resources available to assist an officer encountering
a person with traumatic brain injury.
(f) Descriptions of the procedures an officer should use to ensure compliance
with the Americans with Disabilities Act when encountering a person with traumatic
brain injury.
(5) The deputy secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
public safety services, shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to
implement the provisions of this Subsection, including a waiver of liability for the
release of any medical information. Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.
49:966(B)(12), the House and Senate committees on transportation, highways and
public works shall have oversight of the adoption of rules and regulations required
by this Subsection.
T. U. No fee shall be charged for transactions to issue a duplicate special
identification card to correct an address due to the renaming of a street or highway
in accordance with a parish or municipal ordinance.
U. V. Every state identification card issued by OMV shall include the words
"Crisis Lifeline dial 988".